Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-485
License requirements;
inspection; issuance.

Upon receipt of the application,
the commission shall inspect the area proposed to be licensed described in
such application and its premises and facilities. The commission shall also
inspect the area where game birds are to be propagated, reared, and liberated
and the cover for game birds on such area. The commission shall also ascertain
the ability of the applicant to operate a property of this character. If the
commission finds (1) that the area is of the size specified in section 37-484,
(2) that the area is comprised of one or more tracts and each
tract is a distance of no more than two miles from at least one other tract
in the proposed area, (3) that the area has the proper requirements
for the operation of such a property, (4) that the game birds propagated or
released thereon are not likely to be diseased and a menace to other game,
(5) that the operation of such property will not work a fraud upon persons
who may be permitted to hunt thereon, and (6) that the issuing of the license
will otherwise be in the public interest, the commission shall approve such
application and issue a game breeding and controlled shooting area license
for the operation of such a property on the tract described in such application
with the rights and subject to the limitations prescribed in sections 37-484
to 37-496.

Laws 1957, c. 152, § 2, p. 492;

Laws 1969, c. 297, § 2, p. 1070;

Laws 1989, LB 34, § 49;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-902;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 195;

Laws 2011, LB41, § 17.